Utah, session 2026, HB368.
Section 1. Section 26B-7-124 is amended to read:26B-7-124. Rules for public cold baths.(1)As used in this section,:(a)"Common areas" means the non-dwelling communal areas accessible to all residents of an apartment building.(b) "public"Public cold bath" means a tub or tank that:(a)(i)is used by, regardless of whether there is a charge or payment for use:(i)(A)(I)the general public, regardless of whether there is a charge or payment for use; and; or(II)residents of an apartment building in the common areas; and(ii)(B)one batherup to five bathers at a time;(b)(ii)contains chilled water that is:(i)(A)maintained at a temperature lower than 60 degrees Fahrenheit;(ii)(B)no more than 180650 gallons in volume; and(iii)(C)at a depth that allows the bather to maintain the bather's head above the water while in a seated position; and(c)(iii)continuously filters and sanitizes the chilled water.(2)The department may not adopt a rule that restricts, limits, or imposes requirements on the operation of a public cold bath.

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.